Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1007
Custody awaiting trial; deadline; release after hearing.

A defendant charged with any offense or offenses shall not be held in custody awaiting trial on such offense or offenses for a period of time longer than the maximum possible sentence of imprisonment authorized for such offense or offenses. On the next judicial day after expiration of such deadline, the defendant shall be released on such defendant's personal recognizance, subject to conditions of release the court may impose after a hearing.

Laws 2020, LB881, § 22.